Hawaii statutes.
§46-43 County records. (a)
Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the county
legislative body shall determine whether, and the extent to which, the county
shall create, accept, retain, or store in electronic form any records and
convert records to electronic form.

(b) The director of finance of each county,
with the approval of the legislative body and the legal advisor of the county,
may authorize the destruction by burning, machine shredding, chemical
disintegration, or other acceptable method of disposal of:

(1) All warrants of the county that have been paid
and that bear any date ten years prior to the date of destruction; and

(2) All bonds and interest coupons of the county that
have been canceled or paid and that bear any date two years prior to the date
of destruction.

(c) The director of finance, with the approval
of the county legislative body and the county's legal advisor, shall determine
the care, custody, and disposition of other county records and may destroy all
vouchers, documents, and other records or papers, exclusive of records required
either by law or by the legislative body of the county to be permanently
retained, that have been on file or retained for a minimum period to be
determined by the legislative body of the county by resolution. [L 1947, c 146,
pt of §1; RL 1955, §138-8; am L 1963, c 22, §1; am L 1965, c 95, §1; HRS
§46-43; gen ch 1985; am L 2005, c 177, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next